src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-I-I-inaatsi_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  +ero+:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.+fst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.+fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - inaattsi - ok : # -m inanimate intransitive verb, appear AEW NA1
     PS/niit+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: niitsinaattsiwa
     PS/iik+PS/oomok+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: iikoomoksinaattsiwa
     PS/iik+PS/ohpo+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: iikohpoinaattsiwa
     PS/ii+PS/hkana+PS/omia'nist+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Pl: iihkanaomia'nistsinaattsiyi
     PS/yaak+PS/isttsikohpo+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: aaksisttsikohpoinaattsiwa
     PS/yaak+PS/ipiiw+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: aaksipiiyinaattsiwa
     PS/iik+PS/aanist+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: iikaanistsinaattsiwa
     PS/sikotahko+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: sikotahkoinaattsiwa
     PS/ii+PS/sstsaap+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: iisstsaapinaattsiwa
     PS/ii+PS/ohsi+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: issiinaattsiwa
     PS/ipiiw+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: ipiiyinaattsiwa
     PS/a+PS/apoyi+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: aapoyiinaattsiwa
     PS/yaak+PS/aanist+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: aakaanistsinaattsiwa
     PS/yaak+PS/apoyi+inaattsi+VII+Ind+0Sg: aakapoyiinaattsiwa
